Missouri, session 2026, HCR44.
Be it enacted by the General Assembly of the state of Missouri, as follows:
WHEREAS, Redd Foxx was one of the most influential comedians in American
history and a true St. Louis original; and

WHEREAS,rising from poverty and segregation, Foxx built a groundbreaking career
by telling the truth without apology. Known as "the King of the Party Records", Foxx
released dozens of best-selling comedy albums that shaped modern stand-up and influenced
generations of performers; and

WHEREAS, his fearless humor tackled race, class, aging, and everyday struggles
with sharp wit and unmatched timing; and

WHEREAS, Foxx became a household name as Fred Sanford on Sanford and Son,
where his legendary catchphrase "I’m coming to join you, Elizabeth!" entered popular
culture; and

WHEREAS, he broke barriers for Black performers in primetime television while
insisting on authenticity and dignity; and

WHEREAS, beyond the spotlight, Foxx quietly mentored young comedians and
helped others find their footing:


HCR 44 2
NOW THEREFORE BE IT RESOLVED that the members of the House of
Representatives of the One Hundred Third General Assembly, Second Regular Session, the
Senate concurring therein, hereby designate December ninth each year as "Redd Foxx Day"
in Missouri, in recognition of the bold, honest, and unforgettable man who changed comedy
forever; and

BE IT FURTHER RESOLVED that this resolution be sent to the Governor for his
approval or rejection pursuant to the Missouri Constitution.
✔